Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 201.091, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Copy of list to registered voter. The county auditors and the secretary of state must provide copies of the public information lists in electronic or other media to any voter registered in Minnesotanew text begin or national chair of a major political partynew text end within five business days of receiving a complete written or electronic request accompanied by payment of the cost of reproduction. The county auditors and the secretary of state must make a copy of the list available for public inspection without cost. An individual who inspects or acquires a copy of a public information list must not use any information contained in it for purposes unrelated to elections, political activities, or law enforcement. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end